District of Columbia statutes.
4-210.05

Request for hearing.

Any applicant or recipient, or his or her representative may request a hearing by giving a clear expression, oral or written, that he or she wants an opportunity to present his or her case to a higher authority. A request for a hearing shall be accepted by any administrative staff member employed by the Mayor to whom the request is submitted. The Mayor shall acknowledge promptly any request for a hearing, and a representative of the Mayor shall assist the claimant in submitting and processing his request for hearing. The Mayor shall treat a request made by a representative of the claimant as if made by the claimant; provided, that the claimant shall submit written authorization within 10 days of such request designating that person as his or her representative.

History

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1005, 29 DCR 1060

Section References

This section is referenced in § 4-205.64, § 4-205.66, § 4-210.02, § 4-210.04, and § 4-754.41.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-210.5.